Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101.3, is
amended to read as follows:

ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 1317 Page 1

Section 6-101.3. As used in Section 6-101 et seq. of this
title:
1. "Administrator" means a duly certified person who devotes a
majority of time to service as a superintendent, elementary
superintendent, principal, supervisor, vice principal or in any
other administrative or supervisory capacity in the school district;
2. "Dismissal" means the discontinuance of the teaching service
of an administrator or teacher during the term of a written
contract, as provided by law;
3. "Nonreemployment" means the nonrenewal of the contract of an
administrator or teacher upon expiration of the contract;
4. "Career teacher" means a teacher who:
a. is employed by a school district prior to the 2017-
2018 school year and has completed three (3) or more
consecutive complete school years as a teacher in one
school district under a written continuing or
temporary teaching contract, or
b. is employed for the first time by a school district
under a written continuing or temporary teaching
contract during the 2017-2018 school year and
thereafter, and:
(1) has completed three (3) consecutive complete
school years as a teacher in one school district
under a written continuing or temporary teaching
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 1317 Page 2

contract and has achieved a district evaluation
rating of "superior" as measured pursuant to the
TLE as set forth in Section 6-101.16 of this
title for at least two (2) of the three (3)
school years,
(2) has completed four (4) consecutive complete
school years as a teacher in one school district
under a written continuing or temporary teaching
contract, has averaged a district evaluation
rating of at least "effective" as measured
pursuant to the TLE for the four-year period, and
has received district evaluation ratings of at
least "effective" for the last two (2) years of
the four-year period, or
(3) has completed four (4) or more consecutive
complete school years in one school district
under a written continuing or temporary teaching
contract and has not met the requirements of
subparagraph a or b of this paragraph, only if
the principal of the school at which the teacher
is employed submits a petition to the
superintendent of the school district requesting
that the teacher be granted career status, the
superintendent agrees with the petition, and the
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 1317 Page 3

school district board of education approves the
petition. The principal shall specify in the
petition the underlying facts supporting the
granting of career status to the teacher, or
c. after meeting the requirements of subparagraph a or b
of this paragraph in one school district, is employed
by another school district under a written continuing
or temporary teaching contract and the board of
education of the school district has approved the
granting of career status to the teacher. Status as a
career teacher pursuant to this paragraph shall be for
evaluation purposes only;
5. "Teacher hearing" means the hearing before a school district
board of education after a recommendation for dismissal or
nonreemployment of a teacher has been made but before any final
action is taken on the recommendation, held for the purpose of
affording the teacher all rights guaranteed by the United States
Constitution and the Constitution of Oklahoma under circumstances
and for enabling the board to determine whether to approve or
disapprove the recommendation;
6. "Probationary teacher" means a teacher who:
a. is employed by a school district prior to the 2017-
2018 school year and has completed fewer than three
(3) consecutive complete school years as a teacher in
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 1317 Page 4

one school district under a written teaching contract,
or
b. is employed for the first time by a school district
under a written teaching contract during the 2017-2018
school year and thereafter and has not met the
requirements for career teacher as provided in
paragraph 4 of this section;
7. "Suspension" or "suspended" means the temporary
discontinuance of the services of an administrator or teacher, as
provided by law;
8. "Teacher" means a person defined as a teacher in Section 1-
116 of this title; and
9. "District evaluation rating" means the rating issued based
on the components of the TLE as set forth in subsection B of Section
6-101.16 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026."








ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 1317 Page 5

Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House of
Representatives

Passed the Senate the ____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate















ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 1317 Page 6

ENGR OSSED SENATE
BILL NO. 1317 By: Dossett of the Senate

and

Provenzano of the House


An Act relating to schools; amending 70 O.S. 2021,
Section 6-101.3, which relates to definitions for
teachers; modifying certain definition; updating
statutory language; providing an effective date; and
declaring an emergency.


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 6-101.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 6-101.3. As used in Section 6-101 et seq. of this
title:
1. “Administrator” means a duly certified person who devotes a
majority of time to service as a superintendent, elementary
superintendent, principal, supervisor, vice principal, or in any
other administrative or supervisory capacity in the school district;
2. “Dismissal” means the discontinuance of the teaching service
of an administrator or teacher during the term of a written
contract, as provided by law;
3. “Nonreemployment” means the nonrenewal of the contract of an
administrator or teacher upon expiration of the contract;
ENGR. S. B. NO. 1317 Page 1

4. “Career teacher” means a teacher who:
a. is employed by a school district prior to the 2017-
2018 school year and has completed three (3) or more
consecutive complete school years as a teacher in one
school district under a written continuing or
temporary teaching contract, or
b. is employed for the first time by a school district
under a written continuing or temporary teaching
contract during the 2017-2018 school year and
thereafter and:
(1) has completed three (3) consecutive complete
school years as a teacher in one school district
under a written continuing or temporary teaching
contract and has achieved a district evaluation
rating of “superior” as measured pursuant to the
TLE Oklahoma Teacher and Leader Effectiveness
Evaluation System (TLE) as set forth in Section
6-101.16 of this title for at least two (2) of
the three (3) school years,
(2) has completed four (4) consecutive complete
school years as a teacher in one school district
under a written continuing or temporary teaching
contract, has averaged a district evaluation
rating of at least “effective” as measured
ENGR. S. B. NO. 1317 Page 2

pursuant to the TLE for the four-year period, and
has received district evaluation ratings of at
least “effective” for the last two (2) years of
the four-year period, or
(3) has completed four (4) or more consecutive
complete school years in one school district
under a written continuing or temporary teaching
contract and has not met the requirements of
subparagraph a or b of this paragraph, only if
the principal of the school at which the teacher
is employed submits a petition to the
superintendent of the school district requesting
that the teacher be granted career status, the
superintendent agrees with the petition, and the
school district board of education approves the
petition. The principal shall specify in the
petition the underlying facts supporting the
granting of career status to the teacher, or
c. after meeting the requirements of subparagraph a or b
of this paragraph in one school district, is employed
by another school district under a written continuing
or temporary teaching contract and the school district
board of education has approved the granting of career
status to the teacher;
ENGR. S. B. NO. 1317 Page 3

5. “Teacher hearing” means the hearing before a school district
board of education after a recommendation for dismissal or
nonreemployment of a teacher has been made but before any final
action is taken on the recommendation, held for the purpose of
affording the teacher all rights guaranteed by the United States
Constitution and the Oklahoma Constitution of Oklahoma under
circumstances and for enabling the board to determine whether to
approve or disapprove the recommendation;
6. “Probationary teacher” means a teacher who:
a. is employed by a school district prior to the 2017-
2018 school year and has completed fewer than three
(3) consecutive complete school years as a teacher in
one school district under a written teaching contract,
or
b. is employed for the first time by a school district
under a written teaching contract during the 2017-2018
school year and thereafter and has not met the
requirements for career teacher as provided in
paragraph 4 of this section;
7. “Suspension” or “suspended” means the temporary
discontinuance of the services of an administrator or teacher, as
provided by law;
8. “Teacher” means a person defined as a teacher shall have the
same meaning as provided for in Section 1-116 of this title; and
ENGR. S. B. NO. 1317 Page 4

9. “District evaluation rating” means the rating issued based
on the components of the TLE as set forth in subsection B of Section
6-101.16 of this title.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
Passed the Senate the 3rd day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives







ENGR. S. B. NO. 1317 Page 5